California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(2) If the County Medical Services Program governing board or the board of supervisors of a county that participates in the County Medical Services Program fails to adopt a resolution pursuant to subdivision (a), or fails to inform the Director of Health Care Services of the county’s final selection, by January 22, 2014, then paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) apply to the applicable counties and to the County Medical Services Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 290.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

17600.60.

(a) The County Health Care Funding Resolution Committee is hereby created to do all of the following:

(1) Determine whether the calculation of the historical percentage or amount to be applied in calculations in Sections 17612.3 and 17613.3 complies with those sections, taking into account the data and calculations provided by the county and any alternative data and calculations submitted by the department.

(2) Hear and determine petitions from certain counties, as defined, to make particularized changes in what provisions of Section 17600.50 are controlling.

(3) Hear and determine petitions
 for an alternative cost calculation to the cost per person calculation in subdivision (c) of Section 17613.2.

(b) The committee shall consist of the following members:

(1) One person selected by the California State Association of Counties.

(2) One person selected by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(3) One person selected by the Director of Finance.

(c) (1) The committee is not subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and shall be exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of
 Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The Department of Finance shall provide staff for the committee.

(2) Pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution, the Legislature finds and declares that the public interest in affordable and accessible health care outweighs the public interest in access to these proceedings.

(d) (1) A county or city and county, that chose to be subject to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) or paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 17600.50 may submit a petition to the committee to be subject to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 17600.50, as applicable, if the county or city and county demonstrates and provides sufficient evidence of both of the following criteria:

(A) There have been changes in expenditures related to state and federal law, regulation and rulemaking, or court decisions that have a material impact on the provision of health care services to indigent adults.

(B) All of the data necessary to participate in Article 12 (commencing with Section 17612.1) or Article 13 (commencing with Section 17613.1), as appropriate.

(2) The form of petition shall be determined by the committee by January 31, 2014.

(3) If the committee approves the petition the county or city and county shall be subject to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 17600.50, as applicable, at the start of the next fiscal year.

(e) (1) A county that chose to be
 subject to Article 13 (commencing with Section 17613.1) may submit a petition to the committee for an alternative cost calculation to the cost per person calculation in subdivision (c) of Section 17613.2 with the documentation of extraordinary circumstances, including circumstances related to the local health care marketplace, provider, and provider contracts.

(2) The county shall submit all necessary data to support its submission.

(f) The committee shall make decisions within 45 days of hearing any petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 358, Sec. 9.   (SB 98)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Mental Health Allocations [17601. - 17601.20.]

17601.

On or before the 27th day of each month, the Controller shall allocate to the mental health account of each local health and welfare trust fund the amounts deposited and remaining unexpended and unreserved on the 15th day of the month in the Mental Health Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account in the Local Revenue Fund in accordance with the following schedules:

(a) (1) Schedule A—State Hospital and Community Mental Health Allocations.AllocationJurisdictionPercentageAlameda 4.882Alpine 0.018Amador 0.070Butte 0.548Calaveras 0.082Colusa 0.073Contra Costa2.216Del Norte 0.088El Dorado 0.285Fresno 2.045Glenn 0.080Humboldt 0.465Imperial 0.342Inyo 0.104Kern 1.551Kings 0.293Lake 0.167Lassen 0.087Los Angeles 28.968 Madera 0.231Marin 0.940Mariposa 0.054Mendocino 0.332Merced 0.546Modoc 0.048Mono 0.042Monterey 0.950Napa 0.495Nevada 0.191Orange 4.868Placer 0.391Plumas 0.068Riverside 2.394Sacramento 3.069San Benito 0.090San Bernardino3.193San Diego 5.603San Francisco 4.621San Joaquin 1.655San Luis Obispo 0.499San Mateo 2.262Santa Barbara 0.949Santa Clara 4.112Santa Cruz 0.558Shasta 0.464Sierra 0.026Siskiyou 0.137Solano 1.027Sonoma 1.068Stanislaus 1.034Sutter/Yuba 0.420Tehama 0.181Trinity 0.055Tulare 0.941Tuolumne 0.121Ventura 1.472Yolo 0.470Berkeley 0.190Tri-City 0.165The amounts allocated in accordance with Schedule A for the 1991–92 fiscal year shall be considered the base allocations for the 1992–93 fiscal year.

(2) The funds allocated pursuant to Schedule B shall be increased to reflect the addition of percentages for the institutions for
 mental disease allocation pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(3) The Controller shall allocate three million seven hundred thousand dollars ($3,700,000) to the counties pursuant to a percentage schedule developed by the Director of Health Care Services as specified in subdivision (c) of Section 4095. The funds allocated pursuant to Schedule A shall be increased to reflect the addition of this schedule.

(4) (A) The State Department of Health Care Services may amend Schedule A in order to restore counties funds associated with multicounty regional programs.

(B) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the State Department of Health Care Services shall amend Schedule A for the
 purpose of establishing mental health base allocations for each county for the 1994–95 fiscal year and fiscal years thereafter, in order to ensure that mental health base allocations for each county do not fall below 75 percent of the allocations for the 1989–90 fiscal year. The money specified in subdivision (c) of former Section 17605.05 shall be used for this purpose.

(b) (1) Schedule B—State Hospital Payment Schedule.

From the amounts allocated in accordance with Schedule A, each county and city shall reimburse the Controller for reimbursement to the State Department of Mental Health, or its successor, the State Department of State Hospitals, for the 1991–92 fiscal year only, an amount equal to one-ninth of the amount identified in Schedule B as modified to reflect adjustments
 pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 4330, subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of, and subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of, Section 1370 of the Penal Code, and subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of, and subdivision (f) of, Section 1372 of the Penal Code. The reimbursements shall be due the 24th day of each month and the first payment shall be due on October 24, 1991. During the 1992–93 fiscal year and fiscal years thereafter, each monthly reimbursement shall be one-twelfth of the total amount of the county’s contract with the State Department of Mental Health, or its successor, the State Department of State Hospitals, for state hospital services. If a county has not contracted with the State Department of State Hospitals by July 1 of any given fiscal year, each monthly reimbursement shall be an amount equal to one-twelfth
 the number of beds provided to the county the previous fiscal year multiplied by the current state rate as determined by the State Department of State Hospitals.First YearState HospitalJurisdictionWithholdingAlameda $ 15,636,372Berkeley City 0Alpine 95,379Amador 148,915Butte 650,238Calaveras 100,316Colusa 189,718Contra Costa 8,893,339Del Norte 94,859El Dorado 236,757Fresno 1,429,379Glenn 51,977Humboldt 727,684Imperial 259,887Inyo 363,842Kern 4,024,613Kings 266,904Lake 292,373Lassen 167,367Los Angeles 102,458,700Tri-City 0Madera 131,243Marin 3,248,590Mariposa 117,989Mendocino 471,955Merced 404,125Modoc 94,859Mono 94,859Monterey 2,079,097Napa 2,338,985Nevada 493,786Orange 14,066,133Placer 847,232Plumas 130,463Riverside 4,891,077Sacramento 4,547,506San Benito 259,887San Bernardino 5,587,574San Diego 6,734,976San Francisco 23,615,688San Joaquin 927,018San Luis Obispo 719,887San Mateo 6,497,179Santa Barbara 2,168,758Santa Clara 7,106,095Santa Cruz 1,403,391Shasta 1,169,492Sierra 94,859Siskiyou 129,944Solano 5,332,885Sonoma 2,669,041Stanislaus 1,740,205Sutter/Yuba 363,842Tehama 363,842Trinity 94,859Tulare 675,707Tuolumne 304,328Ventura 3,378,533Yolo 1,169,492(2) (A) (i) During the 1992–93 fiscal year, in lieu of making the reimbursement required by paragraph (1), a county may elect to authorize the Controller to reimburse the State Hospital Account of the Mental Health Facilities Fund a pro rata share each month computed by multiplying the ratio of the reimbursement amount owed by the county as specified in Schedule B to the total amount of money projected to be allocated to the county pursuant to Schedule A by the funds available for
 deposit in the mental health account of the county’s health and welfare trust fund.

(ii) The reimbursement shall be made monthly on the same day the Controller allocates funds to the local health and welfare trust funds.

(B) During the 1992–93 fiscal year and thereafter, the amount to be reimbursed each month shall be computed by multiplying the ratio of the county’s contract for state hospital services to the amount of money projected to be allocated to the county pursuant to Schedule A by the funds available for deposit in the mental health account of the county’s health and welfare trust fund.

(C) All reimbursements, deposits, and transfers made to the Mental Health Facilities Fund pursuant to a county election shall
 be deemed to be deposits to the local health and welfare trust fund.

(3) (A) Counties shall notify the Controller, in writing, by October 15, 1991, upon making the election pursuant to paragraph (2). The election shall be binding for the fiscal year. The pro rata share of allocations made prior to the election by the county shall be withheld from allocations in subsequent months until paid.

(B) For the 1992–93 fiscal year and fiscal years thereafter, counties shall notify the Controller, in writing, by July 1 of the fiscal year for which the election is made, upon making the election pursuant to paragraph (2).

(4) Regardless of the reimbursement option elected by a county, no county shall be
 required to reimburse the Mental Health Facilities Fund by an amount greater than the amount identified in Schedule B as modified to reflect adjustments pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 4330.

(c) (1) For the 1991–92 fiscal year, the Controller shall distribute monthly beginning in October from the Mental Health Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account of the Local Revenue Fund to the mental health account of each local health and welfare trust fund one-ninth of the amount allocated to the county in accordance with the institutions for mental disease allocation schedule established by the State Department of Mental Health.

(2) Each county shall forward to the Controller, monthly, an amount equal to one-ninth of the amount identified in the schedule
 established by the State Department of Mental Health. The reimbursements shall be due by the 24th day of the month to which they apply, and the first payment shall be due October 24, 1991. These amounts shall be deposited in the Institutions for Mental Disease Account in the Mental Health Facilities Fund.

(3) (A) (i) During the 1991–92 fiscal year, in lieu of making the reimbursement required by paragraph (1), a county may elect to authorize the Controller to reimburse the Institutions for Mental Disease Account of the Mental Health Facilities Fund a pro rata share each month computed by multiplying the ratio of the reimbursement amount owed by the county as specified in Schedule B to the total amount of money projected to be allocated to the county pursuant to Schedule A by the funds
 available for deposit in the mental health account of the county’s health and welfare trust fund.

(ii) The reimbursement shall be made monthly on the same day the Controller allocates funds to the local health and welfare trust funds.

(B) During the 1992–93 fiscal year and thereafter, the amount to be reimbursed each month shall be computed by multiplying the ratio of the county’s contract for mental health services to the amount of money projected to be allocated to the county pursuant to Schedule A by the funds available for deposit in the mental health account of the county’s health and welfare trust fund.

(C) All reimbursements, deposits, and transfers made to the Mental Health Facilities Fund pursuant to a county
 election shall be deemed to be deposits to the local health and welfare trust fund.

(4) (A) Counties shall notify the Controller, in writing, by October 15, 1991, upon making the election pursuant to paragraph (3). The election shall be binding for the fiscal year. The pro rata share of allocations made prior to the election by the county shall be withheld from allocations in subsequent months until paid.

(B) For the 1992–93 fiscal year and fiscal years thereafter, counties shall notify the Controller, in writing, by July 1 of the fiscal year for which the election is made, upon making the election pursuant to paragraph (2).

(5) Regardless of the reimbursement option elected by a county, no county
 shall be required to reimburse the Institutions for Mental Disease Account in the Mental Health Facilities Fund an amount greater than the amount identified in the schedule developed by the State Department of Mental Health pursuant to paragraph (1).

(d) The Controller shall withhold the allocation of funds pursuant to subdivision (a) in any month a county does not meet the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) or paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), in the amount of the obligation and transfer the funds withheld to the State Department of State Hospitals and the State Department of Health Care Services for deposit in the State Hospital Account or the Institutions for Mental Disease Account in the Mental Health Facilities Fund, as appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 418.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

17601.05.

(a) There is hereby created the Mental Health Facilities Fund, which shall have the following accounts:

(1) The State Hospital Account.

(2) The Institutions for Mental Disease Account.

(b) Funds deposited in the State Hospital Account are continuously appropriated, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, without regard to fiscal years, for disbursement monthly to the State Department of State Hospitals for costs incurred pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4330) of Part 2 of Division 4.

(c) Funds deposited in the Institutions for Mental Disease Account of the Mental Health Facilities Fund are continuously appropriated, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, without regard to fiscal years, for disbursement monthly to the State Department of Health Care Services for costs incurred pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 5900) of Division 4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 204.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

17601.10.

(a) The State Department of State Hospitals may request a loan from the General Fund in an amount that shall not exceed one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) for the purposes of meeting cashflow needs in its state hospital operations due to delays in the receipt of reimbursements from counties.

(b) The Controller shall liquidate any loan, in accordance with Section 16314 of the Government Code, from the next available deposits into the State Hospital Account in the Mental Health Facilities Fund.

(c) If a loan remains outstanding at the end of any fiscal year, the State Department of State Hospitals shall
 determine the amount of the loan attributable to a shortfall in payments by counties against the amount due in Schedule B in the 1991–92 fiscal year or the contract amount for beds purchased in each subsequent fiscal year. The State Department of State Hospitals shall determine any amounts due to counties pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 4330. The State Department of State Hospitals shall invoice each county for any outstanding balance. Sixty days after an invoice has been provided and upon notice to the Controller by the State Department of State Hospitals, the Controller shall collect an amount from the county’s allocation to the mental health account of the local health and welfare trust fund that is sufficient to pay any outstanding balance of the invoice. If these amounts do not provide sufficient funds to repay the outstanding loan, the Controller shall liquidate the balance from the next available deposits into the Mental Health Subaccount in the Sales Tax Account in the Local Revenue
 Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 205.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

17601.20.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, for the 2011–12 fiscal year, except for the funds described in subdivision (c), any funds under this chapter or any other provision of Chapter 89 of the Statutes of 1991 that would have otherwise been deposited into the Mental Health Subaccount subsequent to July 15 shall instead be deposited in the CalWORKs Maintenance of Effort Subaccount.

(b) All of the funds deposited in the CalWORKs Maintenance of Effort Subaccount pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be used by each county and city and county that receives an allocation of those funds to pay an increased county contribution toward the costs of CalWORKs grants. Each county’s total annual contribution pursuant to this section shall
 equal the total amount of funds deposited in the county’s CalWORKs Maintenance of Effort Subaccount during that fiscal year. The CalWORKs Maintenance of Effort Subaccount shall not be subject to the transferability provisions of Section 17600.20 and shall not be factored into the calculation of growth allocations pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 17606.05). Each county’s contribution pursuant to this section shall be in addition to the share of cost required pursuant to Section 15200.

(c) There shall be a monthly allocation from the Mental Health Account in the Local Revenue Fund 2011 to the Mental Health Subaccount pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30027 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 40, Sec. 31.   (SB 1020)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Family Support Allocations [17601.25. - 17601.75.]

17601.25.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, beginning in the 2012–13 fiscal year, except for funds deposited in the Mental Health Subaccount from the Support Services Growth Subaccount pursuant to Section 30027.9 of the Government Code and the funds described in subdivision (c), any funds under this chapter or any other provision of Chapter 89 of the Statutes of 1991 that would otherwise have been deposited into each county’s or city and county’s mental health account subsequent to July 15 shall instead be deposited in the CalWORKs Maintenance of Effort Subaccount. However, in each fiscal year, the amount deposited in the CalWORKs Maintenance of Effort Subaccount shall not exceed one billion one hundred twenty million five hundred fifty-one thousand dollars ($1,120,551,000).

(b) All of the funds deposited in the CalWORKs Maintenance of Effort Subaccount pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be allocated by the Controller to counties or a city and county based on schedules developed by the Department of Finance in consultation with the California State Association of Counties. Each county or city and county that receives an allocation shall use those funds to pay an increased county contribution toward the costs of CalWORKs grants. Each county’s total annual contribution pursuant to this section shall equal the total amount of funds deposited in the county’s CalWORKs Maintenance of Effort Subaccount during that fiscal year. The CalWORKs Maintenance of Effort Subaccount shall not be subject to the transferability provisions of Section 17600.20 and shall not be factored into the calculation of growth allocations pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 17606.10). Each county’s contribution pursuant to this section and
 Section 17601.75 shall be in addition to the share of cost required pursuant to Section 15200.

(c) There shall be a monthly allocation of ninety-three million three hundred seventy-nine thousand two hundred fifty-two dollars ($93,379,252) from the Mental Health Account in the Local Revenue Fund 2011 to the Mental Health Subaccount pursuant to subdivision (a) of Sections 30027.5, 30027.6, 30027.7, and 30027.8 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 20, Sec. 34.   (SB 79)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

17601.50.

The moneys in the Child Poverty and Family Supplemental Support Subaccount shall be allocated to the family support account in the local health and welfare trust fund in each county and city and county by the Controller pursuant to a schedule prepared by the Department of Finance. All funds allocated shall be attributable to the payment of increased aid payments, as authorized by Section 11450.025. Funds that are not allocated in a fiscal year, shall be available for allocation in the following fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 25, Sec. 29.   (AB 1603)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

17601.75.

(a) On or before the 27th day of the month, the Controller shall allocate to the family support account in the local health and welfare trust fund of each county and city and county the amounts deposited and remaining unexpended and unreserved on the 15th day of the month in the Family Support Subaccount of the Local Revenue Fund, pursuant to schedules developed by the Department of Finance in conjunction with the appropriate state departments and in consultation with the California State Association of Counties.

(b) All of the funds deposited in the family support account shall be used by each county and city and county that receives an allocation of those funds to pay an increased county contribution toward the costs of CalWORKs grants, a county contribution
 toward the costs of the CalWORKs single allocation described in Section 15204.2, or both, as determined by the Department of Finance. Each county’s total annual contribution pursuant to this section shall equal the total amount of funds deposited in each county’s and city and county’s family support account during that fiscal year. The family support account shall not be subject to the transferability provisions of Section 17600.20. Each county’s contribution pursuant to this section and Section 17601.25 shall be in addition to the shares of cost required pursuant to Section 15200.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 24, Sec. 52.   (SB 89)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Social Services Allocations [17602. - 17602.1.]

17602.

(a) On or before the 27th day of the month, the Controller shall allocate to counties the amounts deposited and remaining unexpended and unreserved on the 15th day of the month in the Social Services Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account of the Local Revenue Fund, pursuant to schedules developed by the Department of Finance in conjunction with the appropriate state departments based on the estimated 1991–92 expenditures as contained in the Budget Act for programs set forth in subdivision (b), the Controller shall make monthly allocations to
 counties of the funds deposited into the Social Services Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account of the Local Revenue Fund. These allocations shall be made to the Social Services Account of the local health and welfare trust fund. 

The programs to be funded in accordance with the schedule are those set forth in Sections 1794, 1904, 10101, 10101.1, 11322, 11322.2, 12306, 15200, 15204.2, and 18906.5 of this code, and Section 123940 of the Health and Safety Code and the program set forth in Section 1806, as funded in the Governor’s proposed budget. The schedule for the 1991–92 fiscal year shall be considered final on October 1, 1991.

(b) (1) For the 1991–92 fiscal year and every fiscal year thereafter, the Controller shall allocate an amount from the Social Services Subaccount to counties that equals the amount those counties receive pursuant to Sections 16265 to 16265.7, inclusive, of
 the Government Code in the 1990–91 fiscal year.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, counties may use these funds as authorized by Section 16265.7 of the Government Code. 

(c) (1) Pursuant to schedules developed by the Department of Finance, in conjunction with the Department of the Youth Authority, based on the estimated 1991–92 fiscal year expenditures as contained in the 1991–92 proposed Governor’s Budget for programs impacted by the realignment and contained in the allocations to counties of the funds deposited into the Social Services Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account in the Local Revenue Fund. The programs set forth in Sections 894, 1794, and 1904 shall be funded in accordance with the schedules adopted pursuant to this subdivision.

(2) (A) Counties that receive allocations pursuant to Article 24.5 (commencing with Section 894) of Chapter 2 of Division 2, Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 1790) of Chapter 1 of Division 2.5 and Article 10 (commencing with Section 1900) of Chapter 1 of Division 2.5 shall receive the same allocation for the 1991–92 fiscal year that they received for the 1990–91 fiscal year.

(B) (i) Of the amount allocated to San Bernardino County under this section for the 1991–92 fiscal year, five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) shall be designated for the Regional Youth Education Center. 

(ii) Of the amount allocated to Los Angeles County under this section for the 1991–92 fiscal year, four hundred eighty-nine thousand four hundred eighty-six dollars ($489,486) shall be designated for the Sugar Ray Robinson Youth Foundation, and one hundred forty thousand
 eight hundred dollars ($140,800) shall be allocated for the John Rossi Youth Foundation, Inc.

(C) Funding allocated to counties under this section for the 1991–92 fiscal year for programs set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 1900) of Chapter 1 of Division 2.5 shall be allocated to previously funded youth services bureaus at the 1990–91 fiscal year level. 

(d) Subject to the availability of funds from the 1990–91 fiscal year, the Counties of Butte, Colusa, El Dorado, Humboldt, Lake, Madera, Nevada, Placer, Riverside, Santa Cruz, and Yuba may be reimbursed for underallocated Child Welfare Services’ Program costs from unused Child Welfare Services’ Program funds to reflect Public Employees’ Retirement System contributions credits in the 1991–92 fiscal year.

(e) For the 1992–93 fiscal year and fiscal years
 thereafter, the allocations by the Controller to each county and city and county shall equal the amounts received in the prior fiscal year by each county and city and county from the Sales Tax Account and the Sales Tax Growth Account for deposit into the social services account of the local health and welfare trust fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 499.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

17602.05.

(a) (1) Upon notification by the Department of Finance, the State Controller shall reduce a county’s allocation pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 17602 by any realignment withholding amount assessed on the county pursuant to Section 12301.61.

(2) For the fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the county enters into a collective bargaining agreement with the employee organization, the county’s allocation pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 17602 shall be increased by the amount of the reduction made in the prior fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (1).

(b) The State Controller shall deposit any amounts withheld from counties pursuant to
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) into the General Growth Subaccount of the Sales Tax Growth Account of the Local Revenue Fund for distribution pursuant to Section 17606.10. The amounts distributed from the General Growth Subaccount pursuant to this subdivision shall be considered one-time deposits and shall not be included in the realignment bases for the Health Subaccount, Mental Health Subaccount, and Child Poverty and Family Supplemental Support Subaccount pursuant to Section 17600.15 in subsequent years.

(c) This section shall become operative on October 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 82) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 83.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Operative October 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17602.1.

On or before the 27th day of each month, the Controller shall allocate, pursuant to a schedule prepared by the Department of Finance, to the CalWORKs Maintenance of Effort Subaccount of each local health and welfare trust fund the amounts deposited into the CalWORKs Maintenance of Effort Subaccount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 717, Sec. 3.   (AB 1496)   Effective September 28, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Health Allocations [17603. - 17603.]

17603.

(a) This subdivision only applies until the end of the 2012–13 fiscal year. On or before the 27th day of each month, the Controller shall allocate to the local health and welfare trust fund health accounts the amounts deposited and remaining unexpended and unreserved on the 15th day of the month in the Health Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account of the Local Revenue Fund, in accordance with paragraphs (1) and (2):

(1) For the 1991–92 fiscal year, allocations shall be made in accordance with the following schedule:JurisdictionAllocation 
PercentageAlameda 4.5046Alpine 0.0137Amador 0.1512Butte 0.8131Calaveras 0.1367Colusa0.1195Contra Costa 2.2386Del Norte 0.1340El Dorado 0.5228Fresno 2.3531Glenn 0.1391Humboldt 0.8929Imperial 0.8237Inyo 0.1869Kern 1.6362Kings 0.4084Lake 0.1752Lassen 0.1525Los Angeles 37.2606 Madera 0.3656Marin1.0785Mariposa 0.0815Mendocino 0.2586Merced 0.4094Modoc 0.0923Mono 0.1342Monterey 0.8975Napa 0.4466Nevada 0.2734Orange 5.4304Placer 0.2806Plumas 0.1145Riverside 2.7867Sacramento 2.7497San Benito 0.1701San Bernardino2.4709San Diego 4.7771San Francisco 7.1450San Joaquin 1.0810San Luis Obispo 0.4811San Mateo 1.5937Santa Barbara 0.9418Santa Clara 3.6238Santa Cruz 0.6714Shasta 0.6732Sierra 0.0340Siskiyou0.2246Solano 0.9377Sonoma 1.6687Stanislaus 1.0509Sutter 0.4460Tehama 0.2986Trinity 0.1388Tulare 0.7485Tuolumne 0.2357Ventura 1.3658Yolo 0.3522Yuba 0.3076Berkeley 0.0692Long Beach 0.2918Pasadena 0.1385(2) For the 1992–93 fiscal year and fiscal years thereafter until the commencement of the 2013–14 fiscal year, the allocations to each county and city and county shall equal the amounts received in the prior fiscal year by each county, city, and city and county from the Sales Tax Account and the Sales Tax Growth Account of the Local Revenue Fund into the health and welfare trust fund.

(b) (1) For the 2013–14 fiscal year, on the 27th day of each month, the Controller shall allocate, in the same proportion as funds in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) were allocated, to each county’s and city and county’s local health and welfare trust fund health accounts, the amounts deposited and remaining unexpended and unreserved on the 15th day of the month in the Health Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account of the Local Revenue Fund.

(2) (A) Beginning January 2014 and for the remainder of the 2013–14 fiscal year, on or before the 27th day of each month, the Controller shall transfer to the Family Support Subaccount from the Health Subaccount amounts determined pursuant to a schedule prepared by the Department of Finance in consultation with the California State Association of Counties. Cumulatively, no more than three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) shall be transferred.

(B) Every month, after the transfers in subparagraph (A) have occurred, the remainder shall be allocated to the counties and cities and counties in the same proportions as funds in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) were allocated.

(C) For counties participating in the County Medical Services Program, transfers from each county shall not be greater than the
 monthly amount the county would otherwise pay pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (j) of Section 16809 for participation in the County Medical Services Program. Any difference between the amount paid by these counties and the proportional share of the three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) calculated as payable by these counties and the County Medical Services Program shall be paid from the funds available for allocation to the County Medical Services Program in accordance with this code.

(3) For the 2013–14 fiscal year, the Controller, using the same timing and criteria used in paragraph (1), shall allocate to each city, not to include a city and county, funds that shall equal the amounts received in the prior fiscal year by each city from the Sales Tax Account and the Sales Tax Growth Account of the Local Revenue Fund into the health and welfare trust fund.

(c) (1) For the 2014–15 fiscal year and for every fiscal year thereafter, the Department of Finance, in consultation with the California State Association of Counties, shall calculate the amount each county or city and county shall contribute to the Family Support Subaccount in accordance with Section 17600.50.

(2) On or before the 27th day of each month, the Controller shall transfer, based on a schedule prepared by the Department of Finance in consultation with the California State Association of Counties, from the funds deposited and remaining unexpended and unreserved on the 15th day of the month in the Health Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account of the Local Revenue Fund to the Family Support Subaccount, funds that equal, over the course of the year, the amount determined in paragraph (1) pursuant to a schedule provided by the Department of Finance.

(3) After the transfer in paragraph (2) has occurred, the Controller shall allocate on or before the 27th day of each month to the Health Account in the local health and welfare trust fund of every county and city and county from a schedule prepared by the Department of Finance, in consultation with the California State Association of Counties, any funds remaining in the Health Account from the funds deposited and remaining unexpended and unreserved on the 15th day of the month in the Health Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account of the Local Revenue Fund. The schedule shall be prepared as the allocations would have been distributed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(4) For the 2014–15 fiscal year and for every fiscal year thereafter, the Controller, using the same timing and criteria as had been used in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), shall allocate to each city, not to
 include a city and county, funds that equal the amounts received in the prior fiscal year by each city from the Sales Tax Account and the Sales Tax Growth Account of the Local Revenue Fund into the health and welfare trust fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 325.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Vehicle License Fee Allocations [17604. - 17604.]

17604.

(a) All motor vehicle license fee revenues collected in the 1991–92 fiscal year that are deposited to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund shall be credited to the Vehicle License Fee Account of that fund.

(b) (1) For the 1992–93 fiscal year through the 2014–15 fiscal year, inclusive, from vehicle license fee proceeds from revenues deposited to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund, the Controller shall make monthly deposits to the Vehicle License Fee Account of the Local Revenue Fund until the deposits equal the amounts that were allocated to counties, cities, and cities and counties in the prior fiscal year pursuant to this chapter from the Vehicle License Fee Account in the Local Revenue Fund and the Vehicle License Fee Account and the
 Vehicle License Fee Growth Account in the Local Revenue Fund.

(2) Any excess vehicle fee revenues deposited into the Local Revenue Fund pursuant to Section 11001.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall be deposited in the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account of the Local Revenue Fund.

(3) The Controller shall calculate the difference between the total amount of vehicle license fee proceeds deposited to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11001.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and deposited into the Vehicle License Fee Account for the period of July 16, 2009, to July 15, 2010, inclusive, and the amount deposited for the period of July 16, 2010, to July 15, 2011, inclusive.

(4) Of vehicle license fee proceeds deposited to the Vehicle License Fee Account after
 July 15, 2011, an amount equal to the difference calculated in paragraph (3) shall be deemed to have been deposited during the period of July 16, 2010, to July 15, 2011, inclusive, and allocated to cities, counties, and a city and county as if those proceeds had been received during the 2010–11 fiscal year.

(c) (1) On or before the 27th day of each month, the Controller shall allocate to each county, city, or city and county, the amounts deposited and remaining unexpended and unreserved on the 15th day of the month in the Vehicle License Fee Account of the Local Revenue Fund, in accordance with paragraphs (2) and (3).

(2) For the 1991–92 fiscal year, allocations shall be made in accordance with the following schedule:JurisdictionAllocation